Hawaii statutes.
§490:3-417 Presentment warranties. (a)
If an unaccepted draft is presented to the drawee for payment or acceptance and
the drawee pays or accepts the draft:

(1) The person obtaining payment or acceptance, at
the time of presentment; and

(2) A previous transferor of the draft, at the time
of transfer, warrant to the drawee making payment or accepting the draft in
good faith that:

(A) The warrantor is, or was, at the time the
warrantor transferred the draft, a person entitled to enforce the draft or authorized
to obtain payment or acceptance of the draft on behalf of a person entitled to
enforce the draft;

(B) The draft has not been altered;

(C) The warrantor has no knowledge that the
signature of the drawer of the draft is unauthorized; and

(D) If the draft is a demand draft, creation
of the demand draft according to the terms on its face was authorized by the
person identified as drawer.

(b) A drawee making payment may recover from
any warrantor damages for breach of warranty equal to the amount paid by the
drawee less the amount the drawee received or is entitled to receive from the
drawer because of the payment. In addition, the drawee is entitled to
compensation for expenses and loss of interest resulting from the breach. The
right of the drawee to recover damages under this subsection is not affected by
any failure of the drawee to exercise ordinary care in making payment. If the
drawee accepts the draft, breach of warranty is a defense to the obligation of
the acceptor. If the acceptor makes payment with respect to the draft, the
acceptor is entitled to recover from any warrantor for breach of warranty the
amounts stated in this subsection.

(c) If a drawee asserts a claim for breach of
warranty under subsection (a) based on an unauthorized indorsement of the draft
or an alteration of the draft, the warrantor may defend by proving that the
indorsement is effective under section 490:3-404 or 490:3-405 or the drawer is
precluded under section 490:3-406 or 490:4-406 from asserting against the
drawee the unauthorized indorsement or alteration.

(d) If:

(1) A dishonored draft is presented for payment to
the drawer or an indorser; or

(2) Any other instrument is presented for payment to
a party obliged to pay the instrument; and

(3) Payment is received, the following rules apply:

(A) The person obtaining payment and a prior
transferor of the instrument warrant to the person making payment in good faith
that the warrantor is, or was, at the time the warrantor transferred the
instrument, a person entitled to enforce the instrument or authorized to obtain
payment on behalf of a person entitled to enforce the instrument; and

(B) The person making payment may recover
from any warrantor for breach of warranty an amount equal to the amount paid plus
expenses and loss of interest resulting from the breach.

(e) The warranties stated in subsections (a)
and (d) cannot be disclaimed with respect to checks. Unless notice of a claim
for breach of warranty is given to the warrantor within thirty days after the
claimant has reason to know of the breach and the identity of the warrantor,
the liability of the warrantor under subsection (b) or (d) is discharged to the
extent of any loss caused by the delay in giving notice of the claim.

(f) A cause of action for breach of warranty
under this section accrues when the claimant has reason to know of the breach.

(g) A demand draft is a check, as provided in
section 490:3-104(f). [L 1991, c 118, pt of §1; am L 1998, c 241, §4]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next